Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 19 Compulsory Attendance
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-19-1.
Attendance required.

Every child who has completed, or will have completed, six (6) years of life on or before September 1 of any school year, or is enrolled in kindergarten, and has not completed eighteen (18) years of life, shall regularly attend some public day school during all the days and hours that the public schools are in session in the city or town in which the child resides. The public school shall be responsible for regular attendance data monitoring of all students and early identification of emergent truant behavior. Prior to referring truant students to family court, schools must do their due diligence to assure all interventions have taken place. This includes, and is not limited to:

Consultation with the parent or guardian; and

Coordination with the student’s school-identified support team such as the individualized education plan, behavioral support, or attendance teams.

Every person having under his or her control a child, as described in this section, shall cause the child to attend school as required by this section, and for every neglect of this duty, the person having control of the child shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day, or part of a day, that the child fails to attend school, and if the total of these days is more than thirty (30) school days during any school year, then the person shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months or shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both; provided, that if the person so charged shall prove that the child has attended, for the required period of time, a private day school approved by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education pursuant to §

16-60-6(10)

; or a course of at-home instruction approved by the school committee of the town where the child resides; or has been accepted into an accredited postsecondary education program; or has obtained a waiver under subsection (b); or that the physical or mental condition of the child was such as to render his or her attendance at school inexpedient or impracticable; or that the child was excluded from school by virtue of some other general law or regulation, then attendance shall not be obligatory nor shall the penalty be incurred.

A waiver to the compulsory attendance requirement may be granted by the superintendent only upon proof that the pupil has an alternative learning plan for obtaining either a high school diploma or its equivalent.

Alternative-learning plans shall include age-appropriate academic rigor and the flexibility to incorporate the pupil’s interests and manner of learning. These plans may include, but are not limited to, such components, or combination of components, of extended learning opportunities as independent study, private instruction, performing groups, internships, community service, apprenticeships, and online courses that are currently funded and available to the school department and/or the community. In developing these alternative-learning plans, consideration shall be given to the unique difficulties and interruptions that many students are experiencing because of the COVID-19 pandemic. Accordingly, these alternative-learning plans may incorporate alternatives and extended breaks in study that would not be considered preferable under non-pandemic circumstances.

Alternative-learning plans shall be developed, and amended if necessary, in consultation with the pupil, a school guidance counselor, the school principal, and at least one parent or guardian of the pupil, and submitted to the superintendent for approval. An alternative-learning plan may, but is not required to, incorporate an extended withdrawal as set forth in this section.

If the superintendent does not approve the alternative-learning plan, the parent or guardian of the pupil may appeal such decision to the school committee. A parent or guardian may appeal the decision of the school committee to the commissioner of education pursuant to chapter 39 of this title (hereinafter collectively referred to as the “reviewing body”).

In making decisions regarding the approval of an alternative-learning plan, consideration shall be given to the unique difficulties and interruptions that many students are experiencing because of the COVID-19 pandemic. Accordingly, alternative-learning plans may be approved that may incorporate alternatives and extended breaks in study that would not be considered preferable under non-pandemic circumstances. The provisions of this section shall not require the approval of an alternative-learning plan that the reviewing body determines is not in the best interests of the child.

In addition, this section authorizes the granting of an extended withdrawal from school. An extended withdrawal from school is a withdrawal that may be authorized that is not intended to be a permanent withdrawal but that is extended because of unique difficulties and interruptions that many students are experiencing because of the COVID-19 pandemic. A student in an extended withdrawal shall still be considered to be enrolled in school and will not need to be re-enrolled for purposes of returning to the student’s regular classes. An extended withdrawal may authorize a student to be excused from taking any classes during the withdrawal period or to undertake a reduced number of classes than the student would otherwise take as an enrolled student. An extended withdrawal shall include provisions to periodically monitor and check-in on the status of the student and the student’s ability to return to the public school learning environment. An extended withdrawal pursuant to this subsection may be granted to any student, regardless of age.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or otherwise interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28 or to allow any school committee to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

No school shall use a student’s truancy or absenteeism as the sole basis for using an out-of-school suspension as a disciplinary action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1492, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 14; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1923, ch. 482, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 678, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 812, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2360, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2505, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-1

; P.L. 1984, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 642, § 4; P.L. 1989, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 60, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 233, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 255, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 226, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 338, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 376, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 125, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 467, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 471, § 2; P.L. 2022, ch. 368, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 369, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 389, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 390, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

16-19-1.1.
Grants and gifts — Acceptance and expenditure — Coventry — Woonsocket.

The Coventry and Woonsocket school departments or school committees may accept any and all donations, gifts and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the federal government, or any governmental entity or agency; or from any person, firm, association, foundation or corporation, and shall receive, utilize and dispose of the same pursuant to the express terms or conditions stipulated by such donation, gift or grant.

Any amounts so received shall be deposited with the city/town treasurer and shall be held as a separate account and may be expended by such school department or school committee receiving the grant, gift or donations without further appropriation.

If the express terms or conditions of the donation, gift or grant so stipulate, interest on the donated, gifted or granted funds may remain with and become a part of the donation, gift or grant account and may be expended as part of the donation, gift or grant by the school department or school committee receiving the donation, gift or grant without further appropriation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 434, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 440, § 1.

16-19-2.
Approval of private schools — Requirements — Review.

For the purposes of this chapter a private school or at-home instruction shall be approved only when it complies with the following requirements: (1) that the period of attendance of the pupils in the school or in the home instruction is substantially equal to that required by law in public schools; (2) that registers are kept and returned to the school committee, the superintendent of schools, truant officers, and the department of elementary and secondary education in relation to the attendance of pupils, and are made the same as registers kept by the public schools; (3) that reading, writing, geography, arithmetic, the history of the United States, the history of Rhode Island, and the principles of American government shall be taught in the English language substantially to the same extent as these subjects are required to be taught in the public schools, and that the teaching of the English language and of other subjects indicated in this section shall be thorough and efficient; provided, however, that nothing contained in this section shall be construed or operate to deny the right to teach in private schools or in at-home instruction any of the subjects or any other subject in any other language in addition to the teaching in English as prescribed in this section; provided, further, that any interested person resident in any city or town aggrieved by the action of the school committee of the city or town either in approving or refusing to approve at-home instruction may appeal the action to the department of elementary and secondary education. The department of elementary and secondary education, after notice to the parties interested of the time and place of a hearing, shall examine and decide the appeal without cost to the parties. The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall also grant a hearing to any party aggrieved by a refusal to approve a private school pursuant to §

16-60-6(10)

. The decision of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall, if an appeal is made to the board, be final.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 8; P.L. 1925, ch. 678, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-2

; P.L. 1984, ch. 345, § 1.

16-19-3.
Appointment and compensation of truant officers — Supplies and assistance — Joint officers — Tenure.

The school committee of each city or town shall annually in the month of December appoint one or more persons as truant officers, who shall by virtue of their appointment be clothed with the power of special constables, and fix their compensation, which shall be payable from the appropriation for public schools. The school committee may also furnish all necessary supplies and clerical assistance for the proper and efficient performance of the duties of the truant officer. The school committee of two (2) or more cities or towns may appoint the same truant officer or officers, and any school committee that appoints other employees on a different tenure of office than annual appointments may appoint truant officers on a similar tenure in lieu of the annual appointment mentioned in this section and may fix their compensation from time to time.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, § 3; P.L. 1901, ch. 924, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1946, ch. 1775, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-3

.

16-19-4.
Prosecution of violations — Process — Fees.

The truant officers shall, under the direction of the school committee, inquire into all cases arising under the provisions of this chapter, and shall be authorized, with the assistance of police officers upon request in case of violation of any of the provisions of this chapter, to make complaint for violations of this chapter. They may also serve all legal processes issued in pursuance of this chapter, but shall not be entitled to receive any fees for the service; provided, however, that in case of the commitment of any person under the provisions of any section of this chapter, or for default of payment of any fine and costs imposed, the officer shall be entitled to the regular fees allowed by law for similar service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, § 3; P.L. 1901, ch. 924, § 1; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-4

; P.L. 1996, ch. 347, § 1.

16-19-5.
Inspection and reports of places of employment of minors — Work certificates.

Truant officers and industrial inspectors may visit any places or establishments where minor children are employed to ascertain whether the provisions of this chapter are duly complied with, and may as often as twice in every year demand from all employers of minor children a report containing the names of all children who have not completed sixteen (16) years of life that are employed by them, the report to give the names, ages, and residences of all these children; and all employers of children under sixteen (16) years of age shall produce for the inspection of truant officers and industrial inspectors the permits to work prescribed by chapter 3 of title 28; and for any refusal to make reports provided for in this section, or for any refusal to produce the permits to work provided for in this section, any employer of children shall be fined not exceeding ten dollars ($10.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, §§ 7-9; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 3; P.L. 1936, ch. 2360, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-5

.

16-19-6.
Proceedings against habitual truants and offenders.

Every habitual truant, that is, every child who is required under §

16-19-1

to attend school and who willfully and habitually absents himself or herself from attending school; and every habitual school offender, that is, every child who is required to attend school under the provision of §

16-19-1

, but who persistently violates the rules and regulations of the school which he or she attends, or otherwise persistently misbehaves in the school which he or she attends, so as to render him or herself a fit subject for exclusion; shall be deemed a wayward child as provided in chapter 1 of title 14, and shall be subject to all the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14, and may be proceeded against and dealt with as a wayward child in accordance with the provisions of chapter 1 of title 14.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, §§ 8, 12, 13; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 5; P.L. 1922, ch. 2210, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 4; P.L. 1923, ch. 449, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 840, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-6

.

16-19-7.
Disposition of fines.

All fines under the provisions of §§

16-19-1

and

16-19-5

shall inure and be applied to the support of the public schools in the city or town where the offense was committed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, §§ 9, 15; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 5; P.L. 1926, ch. 840, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-7

.

16-19-8.
Jurisdiction of family court.

Jurisdiction of cases arising under §

16-19-1

may reside with juvenile hearing boards in those cities and towns that so desire to hear these cases and which have established juvenile hearing boards. Any municipal juvenile hearing board established pursuant to this section shall, prior to hearing any compulsory attendance cases, inform the chief judge of the family court, in writing, of its establishment and plan to hear compulsory attendance cases. In all other cases arising under §

16-19-1

jurisdiction shall be with the family court. The town of North Providence shall have the authority to establish a juvenile hearing board pursuant to this section.

The family court shall also have authority to issue equitable orders, enforceable through contempt of court proceedings, needed to enforce §

16-19-1

. As an alternative to the procedure set out in §

16-19-1

, the school committee may file a civil complaint seeking injunctive relief in truancy cases. If the family court rules in favor of the school committee the court may issue an injunction, enforceable through contempt of court proceedings, requiring compliance with the compulsory attendance law. Neither prior resort to enforcement proceedings under § 16-19-1 nor a showing of irreparable injury shall be prerequisite to injunctive relief under this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, §§ 10, 16; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1944, ch. 1441, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-8

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 31; P.L. 1984, ch. 345, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 281, § 1.

16-19-9.
Immunity from liability for costs.

No officer complaining under any of the provisions of this chapter shall be required to give surety for costs; and the officer shall not in any way become liable for any costs that may accrue on the complaint.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 64, §§ 11, 17; P.L. 1902, ch. 1009, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 72, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 76, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 181, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

16-19-9

.

16-19-10.
Notification of pupil absence.

Whenever any pupil in grades kindergarten through nine (9) fails to report to school on a regularly scheduled school day and no indication has been received by school personnel that the pupil’s parent or guardian is aware of the pupil’s absence, a reasonable effort to notify, by telephone, the parent or guardian shall be made by school personnel or volunteers organized by the school committee of each city, town, or regional school district or the director or other person in charge of private schools of elementary and secondary grades.

School committees, school personnel, or volunteers organized pursuant to this section shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability in connection with the notice to parents of a pupil’s absence or failure to give the notice required by this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 428, § 1.